Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-20] Change of award by arbitrator.
(a) On motion to an arbitrator by a party to an arbitration proceeding, the
arbitrator may modify or correct an award:

(1) Upon a ground stated in section 658A-24(a)(1) or
(3);

(2) Because the arbitrator has not made a final and
definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration
proceeding; or

(3) To clarify the award.

(b) A motion under subsection (a) shall be
made and notice given to all parties within twenty days after the movant receives
notice of the award.

(c) A party to the arbitration proceeding
shall give notice of any objection to the motion within ten days after receipt
of the notice in subsection (b).

(d) If a motion to the court is pending under
section 658A-22, 658A-23, or 658A-24, the court may submit the claim to the
arbitrator to consider whether to modify or correct the award:

(1) Upon a ground stated in section 658A-24(a)(1) or
(3);

(2) Because the arbitrator has not made a final and
definite award upon a claim submitted by the parties to the arbitration
proceeding; or

(3) To clarify the award.

(e) An award modified or corrected pursuant to
this section is subject to sections 658A-19(a), 658A-22, 658A-23, and 658A-24.
[L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next